District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2802

Powers and duties of the Task Force.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-201, § 3, 37 DCR 7476
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(d), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3702.